Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.140

Powers and duties of director.

The director may promulgate rules, make specific decisions, orders, and rulings, including therein demands and findings, and take other necessary action for the implementation and enforcement of his or her duties under this chapter: PROVIDED, That in the administration of this chapter the director shall not enter any controversy arising over work assignments with respect to the trades involved in the construction industry.

[ 2011 c 336 s 507; 1973 1st ex.s. c 175 s 14.]